Alabama, session 2026rs, HB501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
8 Section 1. For purposes of this act, the following
9 terms have the following meanings:
10 (1) AUTHORIZING ORDINANCE. An ordinance adopted by the
11 Prichard City Council that authorizes the formation or renewal
12 of a district and the levying of benefit assessments.
13 (2) BENEFIT ASSESSMENT. A levy for the purpose of
14 funding activities and improvements that will provide benefits
15 to businesses located within a district.
16 (3) BUSINESS. Any business establishment of the types
17 or classes that are described in the district plan and the
18 authorizing ordinance.
19 (4) BUSINESS OWNER. A person recognized by the city as
20 the owner of the business.
21 (5) BUSINESS OWNERS' ASSOCIATION. A new or existing
22 nonprofit corporation, entity, agency, or public corporation
23 that is under contract with the city to administer the
24 district and implement activities and improvements specified
25 in the district plan.
26 (6) CITY. The City of Prichard.
27 (7) CITY COUNCIL. The City Council of the City of
28 Prichard.
Page 1

Prichard.
HB501 Enrolled
29 (8) DISTRICT. A self-help business improvement district
30 established pursuant to this act.
31 (9) DISTRICT PLAN. A plan as prescribed in Section 4.
32 (10) IMPROVEMENT. An acquisition, construction,
33 installation, or maintenance relating to tangible property
34 that is designed to provide benefits to assessed businesses.
35 Section 2. The city council may create and maintain
36 districts within its corporate limits pursuant to this act.
37 Section 3. (a) Upon receipt of a written petition
38 signed by 60 percent or more of the business owners or
39 authorized representatives of the businesses proposed to be
40 subject to the benefit assessment, the city council may
41 initiate proceedings to form a district by adopting a
42 resolution expressing its intention to form a district.
43 (1) Wherever this act requires the signature of the
44 business owner, the signature of the authorized representative
45 of the business shall suffice.
46 (2) The city has no obligation to obtain other
47 information as to the ownership of a business, and its
48 determination of ownership as reflected in its records shall
49 be conclusive for the purposes of this act in the absence of
50 contrary documentation provided by the owner or authorized
51 representative of the business.
52 (b) The petition of business owners required under
53 subsection (a) shall include a summary of a district plan
54 formulated pursuant to Section 4. The summary shall include
55 all of the following:
56 (1) A map showing the boundaries of the district.
Page 2

(1) A map showing the boundaries of the district.
HB501 Enrolled
57 (2) The types or classes of businesses that will be
58 subject to the benefit assessment.
59 (3) The benefit assessment rate for each type or class
60 of business that will be subject to the benefit assessment. If
61 the assessment is based on a percentage of gross business
62 revenue, the rate may not be greater than four percent.
63 (4) Information specifying where the complete district
64 plan may be obtained.
65 (5) Information specifying that the complete district
66 plan shall be furnished upon request.
67 (c) The resolution of intention described in subsection
68 (a) shall contain all of the following:
69 (1) A brief description of the proposed activities and
70 improvements.
71 (2) The estimated amount of the proposed benefit
72 assessment. If the assessment is based on a percentage of
73 gross business revenue, the rate may not be greater than four
74 percent.
75 (3) A statement describing the businesses within the
76 proposed district which will be subject to the benefit
77 assessment.
78 (4) A description of the boundaries of the proposed
79 district, which may be made by reference to any plan or map
80 that is on file with the city council.
81 (5) A time and place for a public hearing on the
82 establishment of the district and the levy of the benefit
83 assessment.
84 (d) The descriptions and statements required by
Page 3

(d) The descriptions and statements required by
HB501 Enrolled
85 subdivisions (c)(1) through (4) shall be sufficient if they
86 enable a business owner to generally identify the nature and
87 extent of the activities and improvements and the location and
88 extent of the proposed district.
89 Section 4. A tourism improvement district plan shall
90 include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
91 (1) A map that identifies the district boundaries in
92 sufficient detail to allow a business owner to reasonably
93 determine whether a business is located within the district
94 boundaries. The boundaries of a district may overlap with
95 other districts established pursuant to this act.
96 (2) The name of the proposed district.
97 (3)a. The name of the business owners' association.
98 b. In the case of a newly formed nonprofit corporation
99 designated as the business owners' association, the
100 certificate of incorporation or by-laws shall provide that a
101 majority of the business owners' association's governing board
102 shall be business owners, or their authorized representatives,
103 who pay the district benefit assessment.
104 c. Where an existing nonprofit corporation is
105 designated as the business owners' association, the nonprofit
106 corporation shall create a committee, with a majority of
107 members being business owners, or their authorized
108 representatives, who pay the district benefit assessment, and
109 who shall be charged with managing the funds raised by the
110 district and fulfilling the obligations of the district plan.
111 d. A business owners' association shall have full
112 discretion to select the specific activities and improvements
Page 4

discretion to select the specific activities and improvements
HB501 Enrolled
113 within the authorized parameters of the district plan which
114 shall be funded with district benefit assessment revenue,
115 provided that there is a rational relationship between the
116 benefit of the activities and improvements to each business
117 and the assessment amount levied on the business.
118 (4) The activities and improvements proposed for each
119 year of operation of the district and the estimated cost of
120 those activities and improvements. Improvements shall have an
121 estimated useful life of five years or more. If the activities
122 and improvements proposed for each year of operation are the
123 same, the plan shall include a description of the first year's
124 proposed activities and improvements and a statement that the
125 same activities and improvements are proposed for subsequent
126 years.
127 (5) The estimated annual amount proposed to be expended
128 for activities and improvements during each year of operation
129 of the district. This amount may be estimated based upon the
130 assessment rate. If the estimated annual amount proposed to be
131 expended in each year of operation of the district is not
132 significantly different from year to year, the amount proposed
133 to be expended in the initial year and a statement that a
134 similar amount applies to subsequent years shall satisfy the
135 requirements of this subdivision.
136 (6) The source or sources of financing, including the
137 proposed method and basis of levying the assessment, in
138 sufficient detail to allow each business owner to calculate
139 the amount of the assessment to be levied against his or her
140 business. The assessment may be based on a percent of gross
Page 5

business. The assessment may be based on a percent of gross
HB501 Enrolled
141 business revenue, a fixed dollar amount per transaction, or
142 any other reasonable method approved by the city. If the
143 assessment is based on a percent of gross business revenue,
144 then the rate may not be greater than four percent. The
145 district plan may set forth increases in assessments for any
146 year of operation of the district, except that any assessment
147 based on a percent of gross business revenue may not exceed
148 four percent.
149 (7) The time and manner of collecting the benefit
150 assessments and any interest or penalties for nonpayment.
151 (8) The specific number of years, not to exceed 10,
152 during which benefit assessments will be levied, except that a
153 district that finances improvements with bonds may levy
154 assessments during the time to maturity of the bonds if that
155 period exceeds 10 years.
156 (9) Any proposed rules to be applicable to the
157 district.
158 (10) A definition describing the type or class of
159 businesses to be included in the district and subject to the
160 district benefit assessment.
161 (11) Any other item or matter required to be
162 incorporated in the plan by the city council.
163 Section 5. (a) If the city council has adopted a
164 resolution of intention to establish or renew a district and
165 levy a new or increased district benefit assessment, the city
166 council shall hold a public hearing on the establishment or
167 renewal of the district prior to adoption of the authorizing
168 ordinance. Notice of the public hearing shall be mailed to the
Page 6

ordinance. Notice of the public hearing shall be mailed to the
HB501 Enrolled
169 owners of the businesses proposed to be subject to the benefit
170 assessment.
171 (b) The city council shall provide at least 30 days'
172 written notice of the public hearing at which the city council
173 proposes to establish or renew the district and levy the
174 benefit assessment.
175 Section 6. At the conclusion of the public hearing to
176 establish or renew a district, the city council may adopt,
177 revise, change, reduce, or modify the proposed district
178 benefit assessment, the boundaries of the district, or the
179 types or classes of businesses within the district which would
180 be subject to the benefit assessment. Proposed benefit
181 assessments may only be revised by reducing them, either
182 independently or together in a uniform manner. The proposed
183 district boundary may only be revised to exclude territory
184 that will not benefit from the proposed activities and
185 improvements. The types or classes of businesses that will be
186 subject to the proposed benefit assessment may only be revised
187 to exclude the business types or classes that will not benefit
188 from the proposed activities and improvements. Any
189 modifications, revisions, reductions, or changes to the
190 proposed district plan shall be reflected in the district plan
191 prior to the city council's adoption of the ordinance creating
192 or renewing the district.
193 Section 7. (a) If the city council, following the
194 public hearing, decides to establish or renew a proposed
195 district, the city council shall adopt an authorizing
196 ordinance that shall include, but not be limited to, all of
Page 7

ordinance that shall include, but not be limited to, all of
HB501 Enrolled
197 the following:
198 (1) A brief description of the proposed activities and
199 improvements.
200 (2) The amount of the proposed benefit assessment. If
201 the assessment is based on a percent of gross business
202 revenue, the rate may not be greater than four percent.
203 (3) A statement as to the types or classes of
204 businesses that will be subject to the benefit assessment,
205 with the time and manner of the collection of the annual
206 assessment by the city council.
207 (4) A description of the boundaries of the district,
208 which may be made by reference to any plan or map that is on
209 file with the city council.
210 (5) The number, date of adoption, and title of the
211 resolution of intention.
212 (6) The time and place where the public hearing was
213 held concerning the establishment or renewal of the district.
214 (7) The number of protests that were received.
215 (8) A statement that the businesses in the district
216 established by the ordinance shall be subject to any
217 amendments to this act.
218 (9) A statement that the activities and improvements to
219 be conferred on businesses in the district will be funded by
220 the proceeds of the benefit assessment.
221 (10) A statement that the revenue from the benefit
222 assessment collected in the district shall not be used for any
223 purpose other than the purposes specified in the district
224 plan.
Page 8

plan.
HB501 Enrolled
225 (b) The descriptions and statements required by
226 subdivisions (a)(1) through (4) need not be detailed and shall
227 be considered sufficient if they enable an owner to generally
228 identify the nature and extent of the activities and
229 improvements and the location and extent of the district.
230 (c) The adoption of the authorizing ordinance shall
231 authorize the levy of benefit assessments in each of the years
232 referred to in the district plan.
233 (d) The city council shall enter into a contract with a
234 business owners' association to carry out the purposes of the
235 district.
236 (e)(1) The authorizing ordinance shall take effect 30
237 days after passage unless written protests are received from
238 more than 50 percent of business owners or their authorized
239 representatives.
240 (2) Any business owner that will be subject to the
241 proposed benefit assessment may make a protest of the
242 establishment or renewal of a district during the 30-day
243 period after the ordinance is passed and before the ordinance
244 is effective. Every protest shall be in writing and shall be
245 filed with the city council.
246 (3) The protest shall be in writing, shall be filed
247 with the city council, shall clearly identify the business
248 owned by the individual who filed the protest, and if the
249 individual is not shown in the city records as the owner of
250 the business, shall include documentation that the individual
251 is the owner of the business or the authorized representative.
252 (4) A written protest that does not comply with this
Page 9

(4) A written protest that does not comply with this
HB501 Enrolled
253 subsection shall not be counted in determining a majority
254 protest, but the city council may waive any irregularity in
255 the form or content of any written protest.
256 (5) A written protest may be withdrawn in writing at
257 any time before the ordinance's effective date.
258 (6) If written protests are received from more than 50
259 percent of business owners or their authorized
260 representatives, and protests are not withdrawn so as to
261 reduce the protests to 50 percent or less before the
262 ordinance's effective date, the ordinance establishing or
263 renewing the district will not go into effect and the city
264 shall not levy the assessment.
265 Section 8. If a district expires due to the time limit
266 set pursuant to Section 4(8), a new district plan may be
267 established or the expiring district may be renewed pursuant
268 to this act.
269 Section 9. (a) The collection of the benefit
270 assessments levied pursuant to this act shall be made at the
271 time and in the manner set forth by the city council in the
272 authorizing ordinance. All delinquent payments for benefit
273 assessments levied pursuant to this act may be charged
274 interest and penalties. A percentage of the benefit
275 assessments will be retained by the city council to offset the
276 cost of collection as set forth in the authorizing ordinance.
277 (b) Any delinquent payments for benefit assessments,
278 along with any interest or penalties, shall constitute a debt
279 owed to the city council and may be collectable by the city
280 council as a debt under law.
Page 10

council as a debt under law.
HB501 Enrolled
281 (c) Any delinquent payments for benefit assessments,
282 interest, or penalties recovered under this section shall be
283 expended in the same manner as provided in the authorizing
284 ordinance for proceeds of the benefit assessment.
285 Section 10. Bonds may be issued by the city or the
286 business owners' association to pay for improvements in the
287 district, provided that any bond issue is not included in the
288 city's indebtedness for the purpose of Section 225 of the
289 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and otherwise complies with
290 any applicable provision imposed by law. Benefit assessments
291 levied in two or more districts may be pledged to secure a
292 single bond issue to finance district improvements.
293 Section 11. (a) The business owners' association, at
294 any time, may request that the city council modify the
295 district plan. Any modification of the district plan shall be
296 made pursuant to this act. The district plan shall not be
297 modified, including the levy of a new or increased benefit
298 assessment, the expansion of the district boundaries, or
299 expansion of the types or classes of business subject to the
300 benefit assessment, except by the request of the business
301 owners' association.
302 (b) Upon the written request of the business owners'
303 association, the city council may modify the district plan by
304 adopting a resolution determining to make the modifications
305 after conducting one public hearing on the proposed
306 modifications. If the modification includes the levy of a new
307 or increased benefit assessment, expansion of the district's
308 boundaries, or expansion of the types or classes of business
Page 11

boundaries, or expansion of the types or classes of business
HB501 Enrolled
309 subject to the benefit assessment, the city council shall
310 comply with the procedures required by Sections 5 and 6 and
311 the majority protest procedure provided by Section 7(e).
312 Notice of all other public hearings pursuant to this section
313 shall comply with both of the following:
314 (1) The resolution of intention to modify shall be
315 published once at least seven days before the public hearing
316 in a newspaper of general circulation in the city.
317 (2) A complete copy of the resolution of intention to
318 modify shall be mailed by first class mail, at least 10 days
319 before the public hearing, to each business owner affected by
320 the proposed modification.
321 (c) The city council, prior to the public hearing
322 required by this section, shall adopt a resolution of
323 intention to modify. The resolution shall state the proposed
324 modification. The public hearing shall be held not more than
325 45 days after the adoption of the resolution of intention to
326 modify.
327 Section 12. (a) The business owners' association shall
328 prepare a prospective report for each fiscal year, except the
329 first year, for which benefit assessments are to be levied and
330 collected to pay the costs of the activities described in the
331 report. The owners' association's first report shall be due 90
332 days after the first year of operation of the district.
333 (b) The report shall be filed with the city council and
334 shall refer to the district by name, specify the fiscal year
335 to which the report applies, and, with respect to that fiscal
336 year, shall contain all of the following information:
Page 12

year, shall contain all of the following information:
HB501 Enrolled
337 (1) The activities and improvements to be provided for
338 that fiscal year.
339 (2) An estimate of the cost of providing the activities
340 and improvements for that fiscal year.
341 (3) The estimated amount of any surplus or deficit
342 revenues to be carried over from a previous fiscal year.
343 (c) The city council may approve the report as filed by
344 the business owners' association or may make recommendations
345 for approval to the annual report within 45 days of receiving
346 the annual report. The annual report shall be final and
347 approved within 90 days following its submission by the
348 business owners' association to the city council.
349 (d) Within 90 days after the close of the business
350 owners' association's fiscal year, the business owners'
351 association shall have an annual audit of its books, accounts,
352 and financial transactions made by a certified public
353 accountant. The business owners' association's annual audit
354 shall be completed and filed with the city council within 120
355 days after the close of the business owners' association's
356 fiscal year.
357 Section 13. (a) Any district previously established
358 whose term has expired, or shall expire, may be renewed by
359 following the procedures for establishment as provided in this
360 act.
361 (b) Upon renewal, any remaining revenues derived from
362 the benefit assessment, or any revenues derived from the sale
363 of assets acquired with the revenues, shall be transferred to
364 the renewed district.
Page 13

the renewed district.
HB501 Enrolled
365 (c) There is no requirement that the boundaries,
366 benefit assessment, activities, or improvements of a renewed
367 district be the same as the original or prior district.
368 Section 14. (a) A district established or renewed
369 pursuant to this act may be dissolved by adoption of an
370 ordinance by the city council after public notice and hearing
371 required by this section when there is no indebtedness,
372 outstanding and unpaid, incurred to accomplish any of the
373 purposes of the district.
374 (b) During each year of operation of the district,
375 there shall be a 30-day period in which businesses subject to
376 the benefit assessment may request dissolution of the
377 district. The first period shall begin two years after the
378 date of establishment of the district and shall continue for
379 30 days. Each successive year of operation of the district
380 shall have such a 30-day period. Upon the written petition of
381 60 percent or more of business owners or their authorized
382 representatives, the city council shall pass a resolution of
383 intention to dissolve the district. The city council shall
384 give public notice of any hearing on dissolution.
385 (c) The city council, prior to the public hearing
386 required by this section, shall adopt a resolution of
387 intention to dissolve the district. The resolution shall state
388 the reason for the potential dissolution, shall state the time
389 and place of the public hearing, and shall contain a proposal
390 to dispose of any assets acquired with the revenues of the
391 assessments levied within the district. The notice of the
392 hearing on dissolution required by this section shall be given
Page 14

hearing on dissolution required by this section shall be given
HB501 Enrolled
393 by mail to the owner of each business subject to benefit
394 assessments in the district. The city council shall conduct
395 the public hearing not less than 30 days after mailing the
396 notice to the business owners. The public hearing shall be
397 held not more than 60 days after the adoption of the
398 resolution of intention. At the conclusion of the public
399 hearing, the city council may adopt an ordinance dissolving
400 the district.
401 Section 15. Upon the dissolution or expiration without
402 renewal of a district, any remaining revenues, after all
403 outstanding debts are paid, derived from the levy of benefit
404 assessments or derived from the sale of assets acquired with
405 the revenues, shall be spent in accordance with the district
406 plan or shall be refunded to the owners of the businesses then
407 located and operating within the district in which benefit
408 assessments were levied by applying the same method and basis
409 that was used to calculate the benefit assessments levied in
410 the fiscal year in which the district is dissolved or expires.
411 Section 16. This act shall become effective
412 immediately.
Page 15

immediately.
HB501 Enrolled
413
414
415
416
417
418
419
420
421
422
423 ________________________________________________
424 Speaker of the House of Representatives
425
426
427
428 ________________________________________________
429 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
430
431
432 House of Representatives
433
434 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
435 was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.
436
437 John Treadwell
438 Clerk
439
440
441
442
443
444 Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed
445
446
447
Page 16